Arkansas, session 2025, HB1265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas at Little Rock for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Dean of STEM 1 $418,024
(2) Chancellor 1 $386,768
(3) Vice Prov. for Res., Innovation & Com. 1 $282,791
(4) Provost 1 $268,500
*HAR029*
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
(5) Dean of Business, Health, and Human Serv. 1 $263,509
(6) Dean Humanities, Arts, Soc. Sciences & Ed. 1 $263,509
(7) Dean of Law 1 $262,220
(8) Chief of Staff 1 $232,104
(9) Vice Chan. for Finance & Administration 1 $225,261
(10) Vice Chancellor for Student Affairs 1 $225,261
(11) Vice Chancellor 1 $221,840
(12) Vice Chan. for Advancement/Development 1 $221,840
(13) Vice Provost - Archives & Collections 1 $214,999
(14) Dean 2 $214,997
(15) Project/Program Administrator 82
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(16) Associate Dean - STEM 2 $204,728
(17) IT Pool 28
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(18) Associate Vice Chancellor 10 $194,960
(19) Dir. Ark. Institute Econ. Advance. 1 $193,822
(20) Chief Information Security Officer 1 $193,384
(21) Dir. of Institute on Race & Ethnicity 1 $191,605
(22) Director of Arkansas SBTDC 1 $188,816
(23) Director of Digital Strategy 1 $188,816
(24) Division Chief 2 $185,702
(25) Assistant Dean - STEM 2 $177,338
(26) Asst. Vice Chan. for Student Affairs 3 $174,046
(27) Director of Information Technology 2 $174,046
(28) Director of Administrative Services 1 $173,915
(29) Director of Financial Services 1 $173,915
(30) Director of Distance Learning 1 $173,466
(31) Director of International Programs 1 $173,466
(32) Dir. of Research & Sponsored Programs 1 $173,466
(33) Associate Dean 10 $172,300
(34) Director Facilities Management 1 $163,702
(35) Assistant Dean 6 $163,388
(36) Director of Records & Registration 1 $156,464
(37) Director of Counseling 1 $154,803
(38) Development/Advancement Admin. 15
Development/Advancement Director $152,602
Development/Advancement Manager $121,320
Development/Advancement Specialist $104,674
(39) Director of University Police 1 $146,532
(40) Director of Human Resources 1 $146,532
(41) HR Associate Director 2 $146,532
(42) Assoc. Director Information Technology 4 $144,564
(43) Director of Institutional Research 1 $142,085
(44) Director of Financial Aid 1 $141,348
(45) Dir. of Community Partnerships 1 $137,620
(46) Director of Health Services 1 $135,999
(47) Dean of Students 1 $131,622
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
(48) Director of Admissions 1 $131,622
(49) Chemical Hygiene Officer 1 $127,980
(50) Assoc. Dir. Research & Sponsored Prog. 1 $127,278
(51) Director of Finance 8 $126,225
(52) Dir. of Adm. & Registrar/Law 1 $125,301
(53) Project Coordinator 3 $121,923
(54) Academic/Student Support 85
Academic Counselor - STEM $120,656
Student Development Specialist $106,608
Academic Counselor $94,342
(55) Director of Testing Services 1 $119,695
(56) Director of Alumni Relations 1 $113,661
(57) APAC Coordinator 1 $111,531
(58) Registered Nurse Practitioner 2 $110,698
(59) Director of Student Activities 1 $109,445
(60) Director of Disability Services 1 $106,608
(61) Coord. of Intramural Activities 1 $103,400
(62) Associate Director of Financial Aid 1 $99,424
(63) Fiscal Support Pool 15
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(64) Archivist 2 $91,593
(65) Public Safety Pool 39
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(66) Institutional Assistant 65 $89,980
(67) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 2 $78,713
(68) Education Counselor 6 $78,713
(69) Skilled Trades Pool 25
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(70) Budget Specialist 3 $72,774
(71) Editor 2 $72,774
(72) Maintenance Coordinator 2 $72,774
(73) Research Project Analyst 3 $72,774
(74) Buyer 6 $69,975
(75) HEI Program Coordinator 22 $69,975
(76) Administrative Support Pool 68
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(77) Assistant Registrar 5 $67,284
(78) Library Support Pool 8
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(79) Maintenance Supervisor 2 $67,284
(80) Special Events Manager 1 $67,284
(81) Archival Assistant 2 $64,696
(82) Stationary Engineer 5 $64,696
(83) Warehouse Manager 1 $64,696
(84) Commercial Artist I/Graphic Art I 1 $62,208
(85) Human Resources Specialist 1 $62,208
(86) Landscape Supervisor 2 $62,208
(87) Logistics Manager 1 $62,208
(88) Landscape Specialist 1 $55,302
(89) Maintenance Assistant 8 $51,130
(90) Mail Services Assistant 3 $45,455
(91) Institutional Services Supervisor 5 $43,706
(92) Institutional Services Assistant 45 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(93) Department Chairperson 37
Department Chair - STEM $228,689
Department Chair $201,304
Director $201,304
(94) Faculty 57
University Professor - STEM $226,285
Professor - STEM $223,889
University Professor $214,168
Professor $197,881
Assoc. Professor - STEM $191,033
Assoc. Professor $184,186
Asst. Professor - STEM $180,763
Asst. Professor $156,658
Instructor - STEM $140,122
Instructor $128,780
(95) Economic Forecaster 1 $218,200
(96) Research/Extension Specialist 30
Senior Research/Extension Spec. $197,881
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
Research/Extension Specialist $184,187
Associate Research/Extension Spec. $156,658
Assistant Research/Extension Spec. $122,453
(97) Research Support 158
Research Associate $146,533
Research Scientist $144,484
Post Doctoral Fellow $122,236
Senior Research Assistant - STEM $100,908
Senior Research Assistant $87,718
(98) Librarian 16 $112,217
(99) Extension Assistant 4 $87,718
NINE MONTH EDUCATION AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(100) Faculty 355
Distinguished Professor - Law $241,426
Professor - Law $225,603
Distinguished Professor $221,655
Professor - STEM $211,566
University Professor $210,452
Professor $194,459
Associate Professor - Law $194,459
Associate Professor - STEM $180,763
Assistant Professor - Law $180,763
Assistant Professor - STEM $175,235
Associate Professor $170,492
Assistant Professor $142,719
Instructor $111,361
(101) Lecturer 330 $89,980
(102) Graduate Assistant 180 $35,147
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(103) Director of Athletics 1 $262,220
(104) Head Basketball Coach 2 $219,247
(105) Project/Program Administrator 12
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(106) Assoc. Dir. of Athletics 8 $166,458
(107) Director of Special Events Center 1 $135,999
(108) Head Athletic Trainer 1 $130,431
(109) Assistant Athletic Director 4 $127,303
(110) Head Coach 8 $127,303
(111) Assistant Basketball Coach 8 $127,303
(112) Development Officer 2 $122,528
(113) Dir. of Printing Services 1 $113,108
(114) Assistant Coach 20 $110,827
(115) Trainer 8 $110,824
(116) Dir. of Strength & Conditioning 1 $110,824
(117) Asst. Dir. of Aquatics & Fitness 1 $106,608
(118) Skilled Trades Pool 5
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(119) Residential Life Coordinator 1 $73,766
(120) Budget Specialist 2 $72,774
(121) HEI Program Coordinator 4 $69,975
(122) Print Shop Manager 2 $69,975
(123) Administrative Support Pool 5
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(124) Assistant Dir. of Student Union 1 $67,284
(125) Printer 6 $57,515
(126) Student Union Section Manager 1 $53,175
(127) Maintenance Assistant 2 $51,130
(128) Reproduction Equipment Operator 1 $45,455
(129) Shipping & Receiving Clerk 1 $45,455
(130) Institutional Services Supervisor 1 $43,706
(131) Institutional Services Assistant 20 $42,025
(132) Graduate Assistant 12 $35,147
NANOTECHNOLOGY CENTER
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(133) Director of Nanotechnology Center 1 $238,501
(134) Project/Program Administrator 3
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(135) Coordinator of Commercialization 1 $135,745
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(136) Research Support 7
Research Associate $146,533
Post Doctoral Fellow $122,236
Senior Research Assistant $87,718
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(137) Graduate Assistant 4 $35,147
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,989

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas at Little Rock for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
thousand three hundred (1,300) temporary or part-time employees, when needed,
at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification
and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Little Rock, to be payable
from the University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund, for personal services
and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas at Little Rock for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $59,774,411
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 9,931,569
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 20,204
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTINGENCY 3,171,150
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $72,897,334

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas at Little Rock, to be payable from cash funds
as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the University of Arkansas at Little Rock for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $34,250,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 4,750,475
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
(03) OVERTIME 250,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 12,872,206
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 39,500,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,000,000
(C) PROF. FEES 8,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 16,594,940
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 30,000,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 13,000,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 81,078
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $162,298,699

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - WILLIAM H. BOWEN SCHOOL OF LAW. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Little Rock, to be
payable from the University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund, from special
revenues received from additional uniform filing fees in circuit court as
authorized by Arkansas Code Annotated 16-10-314, for expenses of the
University of Arkansas at Little Rock - William H. Bowen School of Law for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WILLIAM H. BOWEN SCHOOL OF LAW
EXPENSES $800,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - NANOTECHNOLOGY CENTER. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Little Rock, to be payable
from the University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund, for personal services
and operating expenses, research, and development of viable technologies of
the University of Arkansas at Little Rock - Nanotechnology Center for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029

HB1265
(01) NANOTECHNOLOGY CENTER EXPENSES $2,000,000

SECTION 7. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 8. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 9. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.



01/27/2025 1:45:56 PM HAR029